Ranking the 10 Best Rookie World Series Performances Since 1950 22-year-old Michael Wacha became the 17th-youngest pitcher to win a World Series game when he defeated the Boston Red Sox in Game 2 on Thursday night. 
 The rookie was still highly effective, despite lacking the outstanding command he demonstrated in his previous three postseason starts; he ultimately allowed two runs on three hits and four walks with five strikeouts over seven impressive innings. 
 In the aftermath of Wacha&rsquo;s gem against the Dodgers in Game 2 of the NLCS, I wrote that it ranked as the 10th-best performance by a rookie pitcher in postseason history. However, with the right-hander now pitching in the Fall Classic, I figured I&rsquo;d now take a more specific look at rookie performances in the World Series. 
 Once again, Win Probability Average (WPA) was used to rank each player&rsquo;s single-game performance. This time, however, I decided to include hitters. And to avoid skewed results from late-inning relievers and pinch hitters, I narrowed the focus to only position players who started the game and pitchers who logged at least six innings. 
 Here&rsquo;s a look at the 10 best performances by rookies in the World Series. 
 
 
 1. Madison Bumgarner, LHP, San Francisco Giants (2010) 
 After opening the 2010 season in the minor leagues, Bumgarner was called up to join the Giants&rsquo; starting rotation in late June and went on to register a 3.00 ERA in 18 starts during the regular season. While the 20-year-old left-hander pitched well in both the NLDS and NLCS that year, he put himself on the map as one of baseball&rsquo;s best young pitchers with his Game 4 start in the World Series against the Texas Rangers. 
 
 With the Giants already up 2-1 in the best-of-seven series, Bumgarner fired eight scoreless innings in which he allowed three hits and two walks with six strikeouts. More importantly, San Francisco won the game, 4-0, and went on to defeat the Rangers the following night in Game 5 to win the 2010 World Series. 
 
 2. Bruce Kison, RHP, Pittsburgh Pirates (1971) 
 Called up to the major leagues on the Fourth of July in 1971, Kison, 21 at the time, posted a 102 ERA+ in 95.1 innings during the regular season including two complete games in 13 starts. 
 The 6&rsquo;4&rdquo; right-hander was moved to the bullpen for the postseason where he served as the Pirates&rsquo; long reliever. In his only NLCS appearance against the Giants, Kison tossed 4.2 scoreless innings, allowing two hits and two walks with three strikeouts. 
 After failing to record an out in relief of starter Bob Johnson during Game 2 of the World Series against the Orioles, Kison was stellar out of the bullpen in Game 4. Entering the game with two outs in the first inning after starter Luke Walker was shelled for three runs, the right-hander fired 6.1 shutout frames, allowing only one hit&mdash;he did hit three batters for good measure&mdash;with three strikeouts. 
 
 3. Gil McDougald, 2B-3B, New York Yankees (1951) 
 Gil McDougald had an outstanding rookie season with the Yankees in 1951, appearing in 131 games and receiving significant playing time at both second and third base. At the plate, the 22-year-old batted .306/.396/.488 with 72 runs scored, 41 extra-base hits (14 home runs), 14 stolen bases and more walks (56) than strikeouts (54). Following the season, McDougald was named the American League Rookie of the Year and even finished ninth in the league&rsquo;s MVP voting. 
 Tied at two games apiece with the New York Giants in the 1951 World Series, McDougald provided a series-changing blow in Game 5 with a third-inning grand slam. The Yankees went on to win the game, 13-1, and ultimately clinch the series the following night. 
 
 
 4. Whitey Ford, LHP, New York Yankees (1950) 
 21-year-old Whitey Ford took baseball by storm following his arrival in July of 1950, posting a 9-1 record with seven complete games and 153 ERA+ in 112 innings spanning 20 games (12 starts). The left-hander&rsquo;s impressive campaign resulted in a second-place finish in the AL Rookie of the Year voting following the season. 
 The Yankees opened the 1950 World Series against the Phillies with wins in each of the first three games. In Game 4 at Yankee Stadium, they turned to Ford to clinch the series. The rookie certainly didn&rsquo;t disappoint, as he allowed two runs (zero earned) on seven hits and a walk with seven strikeouts over 8.2 innings. The Yankees, meanwhile, went on to win the game, 5-2. 
 
 5. Brian Doyle, 2B, New York Yankees (1978) 
 The Yankees selected Doyle in the fourth round of the 1972 draft, though he didn&rsquo;t reach the major leagues until 1978. Playing 39 games that season, mostly as a reserve, the 23-year-old batted only .192 in 54 plate appearances and failed to collect an extra-base hit. 
 Doyle would ultimately atone for his poor regular-season performance with an outstanding showing in the 1978 World Series against the Dodgers. Starting all six games at second base, the rookie went 7-for-16 (.438) with four runs scored and two RBI. He enjoyed arguably the best game of his career in Game 6, going 3-for-4 with a double, two runs scored and two RBI. 
 However, that was about it in terms of Doyle&rsquo;s career, as he batted .150 with four extra-base hits in 71 games over parts of the next three seasons. By 1982, he was out of baseball. 
 
 6. Mel Stottlemyre, RHP, New York Yankees (1964) 
 Following his call-up by the Yankees on August 14, 1964, Stottlemyre went on to have the ninth-best season by a rookie pitcher (with at least 96 innings pitched) in baseball history, according to Baseball Reference . Appearing in 13 games (12 starts) over the final two months of the regular season, the 22-year-old posted a 9-3 record and 177 ERA+ in 96 innings and even finished 25th in the AL MVP voting. 
 Amazing, Stottlemyre&rsquo;s only postseason experience came later that year when the Yankees played the St. Louis Cardinals in the World Series. Getting the start in Game 2 on the road with the Yankees already trailing 1-0 in the series, the right-hander fired a complete-game gem, allowing three earned runs on seven hits and two walks with four strikeouts. 
 Stottlemyre came back to start Game 5 of the series and turned in another solid outing, allowing an earned run on six hits and two walks with six strikeouts. However, the rookie was outdueled by Hall of Famer Bob Gibson, who tossed a historic, 10-inning complete game with 13 strikeouts. 
 Hoping to ride Stottlemyer&rsquo;s hot hand, the Yankees started the rookie in Game 7 of the series. However, the right-hander couldn&rsquo;t further his World Series success, as he was saddled with the loss after allowing three earned runs on five hits and two walks, lasting only four innings. 
 
 7. Jacoby Ellsbury , OF, Boston Red Sox (2007) 
 It took Jacoby Ellsbury only two years to reach the major leagues after Boston selected him in the first round of the 2005 draft out of Oregon State University. 
 Called up to make his debut on June 30, 2007, the 23-year-old served as one the Red Sox&rsquo;s hottest hitters over the final three months of the regular season, batting .353/.394/.509 with 20 runs scored, 11 extra-base hits (three home runs), 18 RBI and nine stolen bases in 33 games. 
 
 Ellsbury&rsquo;s late-season success led to him being named as the team&rsquo;s starting center fielder in the postseason, though he didn&rsquo;t truly settle in at the plate until the World Series against the Colorado Rockies. 
 Moved up to the leadoff spot for Game 3 in Colorado, Ellsbury went 4-for-5 with three doubles, two runs scored and two RBI as the Cardinals outslugged the Rockies 10-5. 
 
 8. Ricky Ledee, OF, New York Yankees (1998) 
 Drafted as a 16-year-old in 1990 out of Puerto Rico, Ledee spent eight seasons in the minor leagues before finally making his major league debut on June 15, 1998. The 24-year-old went on to play in 42 games with the Yankees during the regular season, batting .241/.299/.392 with eight extra-base hits and 29 strikeouts in 87 plate appearances. 
 Although he made the Yankees&rsquo; postseason roster, Ledee failed to log an at-bat during the ALDS and subsequently went 0-for-5 in the ALCS against the Indians. 
 Despite his lack of at-bats, Ledee was named as the team&rsquo;s starting left fielder in Game 1 of the World Series. He responded by going 2-for-3 with a double, walk and two RBI. The left-handed hitter would go on to bat .600 (6-for-10) in the series with three doubles and four RBI as the Yankees dropped the Padres in four consecutive games. 
 
 9. Andruw Jones, OF, Atlanta Braves (1996) 
 Regarded as the top prospect in the game by Baseball America heading into the 1996 season, Jones earned a promotion to the major leagues in the middle of August after posting a 1.072 OPS with 34 home runs in 116 games across three minor league levels. 
 The 19-year-old showed flashes of greatness following his call-up by the Braves, batting .217/.265/.443 with five home runs and 13 RBI in 31 regular-season games. As expected&mdash;given his age and lack of professional experience&mdash;Jones struggled to control the strike zone at the highest level and ultimately fanned 29 times in 113 plate appearances. 
 Though Jones was named to the Braves&rsquo; postseason roster, the precocious outfielder served as a pinch hitter and late-inning defensive replacement during the NLDS and for most of the NLCS. However, when he was given the start in left field in the deciding Game 7 of the NLCS against the Cardinals, Jones made the most of the opportunity, going 2-for-4 with a home run and three RBI. 
 
 The rookie was back in left field for Game 1 of the World Series against the Yankees and, amazingly, picked up where he left off in the NLCS, going 3-for-4 with three runs scored, two home runs and five RBI. At 19 years old, Jones became the youngest player to hit a home run in the postseason (and obviously the World Series). 
 
 10. Willie McGee, OF, St. Louis Cardinals (1982) 
 Willie McGee made an immediate impact in the major leagues, batting .340 with nine extra-base hits, 21 RBI and eight stolen bases in 43 games following his debut early in the 1982 season. The 23-year-old ultimately finished the season with a .296/.318/.391 batting line, 24 extra-base hits and 24 stolen bases in 123 games, and he placed third in the NL Rookie of the Year voting. 
 McGee continued to swing a hot bat in the NLCS, posting a 1.154 OPS with two triples, a home run and five RBI in the Cardinals&rsquo; three-game sweep of the Braves. The speedy switch hitter didn&rsquo;t fare as well in the World Series, as the Brewers pitchers allowed him to reach base seven times in 26 plate appearances. 
 However, McGee put himself in the record books with his 2-for-3, two-home run, four-RBI performance in Game 3.
----
49ers vs. Jaguars at Wembley: TV Info, Spread, Injury Updates Game Time and More The NFL comes to London in Week 8 when the San Francisco 49ers take on the Jacksonville Jaguars at Wembley Stadium on Sunday. 
 The two teams couldn't be more polar opposite. 
 San Francisco appears poised for another run at an NFL championship this season, coming into this contest with a record of 5-2. Since losing two in a row early in the season, the 49ers have responded by winning four straight games&mdash;scoring at least 31 points in all four. 
 Meanwhile, Jacksonville has opened up the season with seven straight losses&mdash;most of which have come by way of blowout for the opposing team. ESPN Stats &amp; Info provides some context about the level of ineptitude we're seeing from the Jaguars this season: 
 
 Needless to say, the 49ers are heavily favored to win this game, but anything can happen once the opening whistle sounds. 
 
 
 When: Sunday, Oct. 27, at 1 p.m. ET 
 Where: Wembley Stadium, London 
 Watch: Fox 
 Live Stream: NFL Sunday Ticket 
 Betting Lines ( via Covers ) 
 
 Over/Under: 40.5 pts . 
 Spread: Jacksonville (+14.5) 
 
 49ers Injury Report (via 49ers.com ) 
 Out (definitely will not play) : WR Quinton Patton (foot) 
 Did not participate in practice : WR Jon Baldwin (illness), DT Glenn Dorsey (hamstring), DT Ray McDonald (biceps), DT Justin Smith (shoulder) 
 Limited participation in practice : G Alex Boone (shoulder), T Anthony Davis (shoulder), RB Frank Gore (ankle), CB Carlos Rogers (knee), LB Patrick Willis (groin) 
 Full participation in practice : LB NaVorro Bowman (wrist), TE Vernon Davis (hamstring), QB Colin Kaepernick (foot), S Donte Whitner (knee), WR Kyle Williams (knee) 
 
 Jaguars Injury Report (via Jaguars.com ) 
 
 
 NAME 
 POSITION 
 INJURY 
 WED. 
 THU. 
 FRI. 
 GAME STATUS 
 
 
 
 Allen, Russell 
 LB 
 Ribs 
 LP 
 LP 
 LP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Blackmon , Justin 
 WR 
 Hamstring 
 DNP 
 LP 
 DNP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Branch, Andre 
 DE 
 Knee 
 FP 
 FP 
 FP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Burton, Stephen 
 WR 
 Concussion 
 FP 
 FP 
 FP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Cyprien , Johnathan 
 S 
 Calf 
 FP 
 FP 
 LP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Gabbert , Blaine 
 QB 
 Hamstring 
 FP 
 FP 
 FP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Gratz , Dwayne 
 CB 
 Ankle 
 LP 
 LP 
 LP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Guy, Winston 
 SS 
 Back 
 - 
 - 
 LP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Marks, Sen'Derrick 
 DT 
 Knee/Ankle 
 LP 
 LP 
 LP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Miller, Roy 
 DT 
 Shoulder 
 LP 
 DNP 
 LP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Mincey , Jeremy 
 DL 
 Concussion 
 FP 
 FP 
 FP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Sanders, Ace 
 WR/PR 
 Concussion 
 FP 
 FP 
 FP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Shorts III, Cecil 
 WR 
 Shoulder 
 DNP 
 LP 
 LP 
 Probable 
 
 
 Williams, Stephen 
 WR 
 Achilles 
 - 
 - 
 DNP 
 Questionable 
 
 
 
 Will the 49ers Fall into Trap? 
 
 If ever there was a trap game on the schedule for San Francisco, then this is the one. 
 The 49ers endured a brutal schedule to open the season, facing three of the best teams in the NFL in the first three weeks. However, four big wins in a row have improved San Francisco's record to 5-2, and the easiest part of the schedule is upcoming in the second half after a bye in Week 9. 
 Jacksonville is the weakest team in the league, and the 49ers could probably win this game even if most of the starters sat on the bench. 
 
 However, heading into this contest with anything less than 100 percent focus will doom San Francisco to an embarrassing loss. While Jacksonville's roster can't compare to that of the 49ers, the Jaguars still play every game with fire. 
 You can be sure Jim Harbaugh has drilled this truth into his team. The 49ers won't take the Jaguars for granted&mdash;especially after watching this team hang tough in the first half with the mighty Denver Broncos just two weeks ago. 
 
 Prediction 
 
 The Jaguars haven't been able to run the ball this season, averaging just 63 yards per game, which is the worst mark in the league. 
 
 Chad Henne has proved capable of moving the ball through the air on offense, but the defense of the 49ers has been playing exceptionally well of late, forcing turnovers and applying pressure with regularity. 
 On the other side, San Francisco's rushing attack has been dominating opposing defenses, which is bad news for the Jaguars, which feature the league's worst run defense. 
 The 49ers will dominate the line of scrimmage on both sides, shutting down Jacksonville's offense and running through its defense. 
 
 Final Score 
 49ers win 33-13 
 
 Follow me on Twitter  @JesseReed78 .
----
EPL Week 9 Predictions: Clubs Guaranteed to Prevail This Weekend The Premier League returns to the forefront of club football this weekend with 10 intriguing matchups scheduled for Week 9. 
 Defending league champions Manchester United, who have appeared lost at times through the first eight weeks of the season, will look to right the ship at Old Trafford against a struggling Stoke City squad. 
 Elsewhere, contenders such as Arsenal, Chelsea and Liverpool will aim to keep up their impressive pace at the top of the league table. 
 With kickoff right around the corner, here are my predictions for Premier League Week 9. 
 
 
 
 Arsenal Will Remain Atop Table with Win Over Crystal Palace 
 
 The Gunners will visit Selhurst Park in Week 9 to take on Crystal Palace in a match they are sure to win. 
 By the time kickoff arrives on Saturday, Arsenal will have had several days to recover from their loss to Borussia Dortmund in the Champions League. Therefore, watch for Arsene Wenger's squad to come out energized and in attack mode from the start. 
 Crystal Palace have won just one of four league matches at home this season, beating the Premier League's only remaining winless club in Sunderland back in August. 
 Even worse, the Eagles have been outscored 6-1 in their past two league games at home, falling 2-0 to Swansea City and 4-1 to Fulham last week. 
 Given the immense firepower at the Gunners' disposal and the lack thereof for the Eagles, it's nearly impossible to imagine Arsenal stumbling this weekend with first place in the league table at stake. 
 
 Manchester United Set to Bounce Back vs. Stoke City 
 
 Trailing Arsenal by eight points in the league table coming into the weekend, Manchester United have very little room for error moving forward. Fortunately for the Red Devils, they'll be matched up with Stoke City at Old Trafford on Saturday. 
 The Potters have lost three of their four road matches this season and have mustered just two goals in total in those four matches. Stoke City have scored just four times in total this season. 
 Although United have looked a different club under David Moyes through the first eight weeks of the season, coming away with anything less than three points against Stoke City at home simply isn't an option. 
 Plus, with a handful of winnable matches on the horizon, the Red Devils can potentially ignite a rally with a victory this weekend. 
 
 Southampton Will Stifle Fulham En Route to Fifth Win 
 
 Southampton have been the Premier League's biggest surprise by far through the first two months. But don't expect the Saints to fall back down to earth in Week 9. 
 
 Mauricio Pochettino's men will host Fulham this weekend in a very winnable match at St. Mary's Stadium. 
 And through eight matches, Southampton have been getting the job done with defense. The Saints have only conceded three goals in league play this year, even shutting out Liverpool at Anfield last month. 
 What's more, Southampton haven't allowed more than one goal in a match since last April's loss to West Brom. That's terrible news for a Fulham squad that has struggled to find the back of the net this season. 
 Unlike some of the league's other top teams, Southampton are not a juggernaut on the offensive end. So while many will like the Saints to pick up three more points in Week 9, expect them to do so by a narrow margin. 
 
 Follow Bleacher Report Featured Columnist Patrick Clarke on Twitter.
----
Arsenal's No. 1 Transfer Target in January Should Be Fernando Llorente There is a peculiar trend that often recurs when a prominent club signs a very good but not unequivocally world-class player: He arrives, to much fanfare and anticipation, and is promptly benched. 
 It's odd. One would think that if a club spends much of its time scouting a certain player and negotiating for his transfer before parting with a significant monetary sum to sign him, there would actually be some interest in playing him. 
 However, this has become a pattern amongst world football's elite. Often clubs in a slightly lower echelon than those that typically exile new signings are happy to profit from the latter's neglect. 
 Arsenal are in a perfect position to do just this to improve one of the only weak areas of the squad by bringing in a player who offers plenty of short-term reward with almost no risk. 
 If Arsene  Wenger does not call Juventus and enquire about Fernando Llorente , he will be missing an excellent opportunity to solidify his squad. 
 Before any serious discussion of this move could occur, Arsenal would have to be competing for the Premier League title. Otherwise, bringing in a player as good as Llorente to cement a position that is already occupied by an excellent player is both foolish and impossible. 
 At the moment, though, the Gunners appear to meet this qualification. If they continue to dominate their opponents for the next couple of months, Wenger will probably look into shoring his team up for the final push. 
 There are few areas of the team for which a case for improvement and additional depth could be made. 
 The midfield is absolutely stacked with world-class talent, and several traditional wingers compete with dynamic midfielders for spots on the wings. 
 One could even argue that the striker problem, to which almost every Arsenal transfer story last summer was related, has been solved. 
 
 Olivier Giroud is in scintillating form, so spending valuable cash to acquire another premier option rings of Manchester City -esque profligacy. 
 Behind the Frenchman sits a seemingly reinvigorated Nicklas Bendtner , who has something to prove in what is almost certainly his final year with Arsenal. 
 Other than that, there isn't much else, bar good old Yaya  Sanogo . 
 Consider that Bendtner will not be around for much longer and Arsenal are one kick away from losing their attacking linchpin, and the situation becomes a bit more immediate. 
 Enter Llorente . His minutes have been very truncated in just five games for Juventus since transferring from Athletic Bilbao last summer. 
 With the World Cup on the horizon, he will need to use every match to persuade Vicente del  Bosque to select him for the 23-man squad. 
 Perhaps Arsenal would not afford the sort of playing time that Llorente would desire, but if his current situation at Juve persists and no one else of Arsenal's calibre inquires about him, he will have little choice. 
 Llorente could slot into the Gunners' team rather smoothly. Like Giroud , he is a physical force who possesses the rare ability to marry brawn with the finer skills usually found in smaller strikers. 
 
 Like Giroud , Llorente could provide an intimidating presence in the box and serve as a target for late-game crosses if tossed on as a substitute. Arsenal have almost no players who pose intimidating aerial threats. 
 Best of all, Arsene  Wenger can make a short-term move that will not saddle him with any long-term commitment. 
 Depending on Juventus ' inclination and position in Serie A at the time, they might be willing to let Llorente go on loan until the end of the season. 
 Such an arrangement would be ideal for both parties&mdash;it would allow Arsenal to fill a need without actually buying a player and Juventus would retain control of a valuable asset. 
 Perhaps if Arsenal are a little greedy, a provision allowing for Arsenal's purchase of Llorente at the end of the season could be inserted into the loan agreement. 
 Regardless, the Gunners would receive a well-rounded and experienced striker who could lessen Olivier Giroud 's burden during the most important time of the season. 
 Or he could simply add more firepower to a side that looks as if it is going to have to win the title by outgunning its opponents. 
 Either way, Arsenal would forsake a colossal opportunity by neglecting Fernando Llorente in January. 
 
 Follow @ charliemelman
----
Who Is Better: Eden Hazard or Jesus Navas? This weekend's Premier League action brings a top-of-the-table clash between Chelsea and Manchester City at Stamford Bridge on Sunday. 
 It is a clash that will bring about a huge amount of analysis&mdash;both pre and post-match&mdash;into what we can learn about both sides in what threatens to be the most open Premier League title race in history. 
 As an aside, it also hands us the opportunity to assess individual players in the two sides in one-on-one comparisons and form opinions as to who is the more important for their side or simply the better player overall. 
 Today, ahead of the match, attention turns to the two sides' widemen and, in particular, Chelsea's Eden Hazard and Manchester City's Jesus Navas&mdash;two very different players but both highly effective. 
 But who is better? 
 
 
 Eden Hazard 
 
 Belgian winger Hazard joined Chelsea from Lille last summer after an enormous amount of interest in his signature from elite clubs all around Europe, with Manchester City among those linked. 
 Since joining the Blues, his form has fluctuated massively. A spell towards the end of last season aside, when he was terrific for a period of several weeks, it is fair to say that English football has yet to see the best of Hazard's game. 
 What he has shown, though, is that once Chelsea are able to unlock his full potential, there is a potentially world-leading talent ready to explode on to the Champions League stage. 
 Hazard's major advantage over Navas is that he is two-footed and is happy to play on either side of the pitch or, indeed, centrally. 
 His best position, though, is on the left of the attack where he has proven to be a considerable threat cutting in on to his slightly favoured right foot. 
 One of his strongest attributes is his extreme acceleration, allowing him to race clear of defenders on to long diagonal balls into the channels. With wonderful close control and an excellent first touch, he is then able to collect the ball and terrorise the out-of-position back four. 
 
 His finishing is perhaps not as good as it could be, although his tally of nine Premier League goals&mdash;to add to 11 assists last campaign&mdash;would suggest he is not doing too badly. 
 It is as a supplier of goals that he excels, though, with WhoScored showing that only Juan Mata of Chelsea's squad created more goalscoring opportunities than Hazard's 76 key passes and assists last campaign. 
 At just 22, he has his best years ahead of him and should come to be one of football's most feared attacking players over coming years. 
 
 Jesus Navas 
 
 Manchester City's signing of Spain winger Jesus Navas this summer could prove to be one of the best buys in their recent history, plugging what had been a major gap for the side on the right flank. 
 City lacked real width last campaign and, while the statistics don't really show Navas as having made a major contribution to his side's attack, his mere presence on the wing has given an entirely new dynamic to the Citizens' side. 
 Navas is another blessed with raw pace, but unlike Hazard, he is much more inclined to remain fixed to the right flank and track up and down the touchline. 
 He has supplied more crosses into the area than any other player in Pellegrini's side this season, while only the mercurial David Silva has created more chances per game, according to WhoScored . 
 The result is that City are now able to stretch play much more than they have in recent seasons, using Navas' speed and desire to run at his full-back to open up the rest of the pitch. 
 
 With an all-round target man such as Alvaro Negredo in the box, Navas' tally of assists can only be expected to rise considerably as the season goes on. 
 Balance is key to the success of any side and, with David Silva not particularly inclined to stay wide from his left-sided starting position, Navas offers the ideal alternative from the right. 
 He has not started every City game to date but has been selected by his manager for all the side's biggest tests so far&mdash;including all three Champions League ties. 
 As such, it can only be assumed that he will be asked to give Chelsea's Ashley Cole a working over this Sunday. 
 
 Conclusion 
 When it comes to picking which player is the better footballer and has the bigger potential to be a match-winner, the answer is simple: Eden Hazard. 
 However, the Belgian must still find consistency to his game to be considered truly world class. 
 Navas, on the other hand, has consistency to his game but is not at the same level in terms of talent as his Belgian opposite number. 
 City, though, did not need a Hazard-type player this summer. They needed a more traditional style of wideman and that is what they have obtained in Navas. 
 Hazard, while better than some of their options, would not have offered the same variety. 
 In many respects, Chelsea could also use a Navas-style player&mdash;with their attacking midfield options all very much inclined to drift towards the centre. With such players becoming more and more prevalent, the value of high-quality traditional-style wingers will only increase. 
 Given time, though, Hazard could be the unique talent that wins major trophies for Chelsea and Belgium&mdash;his potential is simply phenomenal. 
 For all his strengths, Navas cannot compete in that regard and, thus, it can only be concluded that Hazard is the better player of the duo&mdash;and by some distance.
----
BMW Masters 2013: Contenders to Watch for Heading into Weekend Action The BMW Masters will continue this weekend from Lake Malaren Golf Club in Shanghai as a handful of the sport's best look to put their stamps on the 2013 European Tour campaign. 
 Up-and-coming American Luke Guthrie leads comfortably after 36 holes, but he will face a stiff challenge from a dangerous field on Saturday and Sunday. With threats like Rory McIlroy , Ian Poulter, Lee Westwood and others all within striking distance, the tournament is far from over. 
 Below, we'll take a closer look at three contenders worth watching over the final two rounds in Shanghai this weekend. 
 *Scores through Round 2 courtesy of EuropeanTour .com . 
 
 Luke Guthrie, -8 
 
 Young American Luke Guthrie won't admit it, but he has to be frustrated that he's only up by four strokes heading into the final 36 holes at the 2013 BMW Masters. 
 Although he started fast with a seven-under 65 on Thursday, the 23-year-old struggled with the wind and couldn't get out of his own way at times in Round 2, following up two of his five birdies with a bogey en route to settling for a one-under 71. 
 Thanks to his impressive first-round performance, Guthrie will have more room for error than any other player this weekend, which will allow him to take more risks. That freedom could be key for him in earning his first-ever European Tour victory. 
 
 Ricardo Gonzalez, -4 
 
 Under-the-radar Argentine Ricardo Gonzalez is one of six players who are four strokes off the lead and tied for second coming into Saturday's third round. 
 The 44-year-old, who has won four tournaments on the European Tour since 2001, bounced back from a difficult opening round to shoot a five-under 67 in Friday's second round. Gonzalez's scorching round was the best of any competitor in Round 2, and had it not been for a bogey on No. 18, he would be entering Saturday in sole possession of second place on the leaderboard. 
 Despite his late stumble, Gonzalez's overall performance on Friday has to have him feeling extremely confident heading into the weekend. 
 If Gonzalez wins this tournament, it'll be because of his ability to avoid mistakes. He has seven birdies to just two bogeys through 36 holes. 
 
 Rory McIlroy , -1 
 
 Although he's seven shots off the lead coming into the weekend, Rory McIlroy is still a legitimate threat in Shanghai. The world's sixth-ranked player has won five times on the European Tour since 2009 and won this event back in 2011. 
 McIlroy may be struggling this season, but he understands the course at Lake Malaren and has done a decent job at creating birdie opportunities for himself through the early rounds. 
 If he can improve his play on the back nine, continue to dominate Nos. 7 and 15 and get a little help from Guthrie and the players at the top of the leaderboard, he'll have a shot to narrow the gap and make his way into contention this weekend. 
 
 Follow Bleacher Report Featured Columnist Patrick Clarke on Twitter.
----
Rugby League World Cup 2013: Predicting Tournament Winners and Contenders European shores once again welcome the Rugby League World Cup this weekend as the globe&rsquo;s finest descend upon England, Wales, Ireland and France. 
 In total, 14 nations will compete to win the biggest honour that the sport has to offer, but not every side enters the tournament with the same chance at the championship. 
 Bastions of both the Southern and Northern Hemispheres will compete on some of the biggest league stages that the continent has to offer, with a few sides standing out among the rest as potential contenders for the label of world&rsquo;s finest. 
 
 
 Countries To Keep An Eye On 
 England 
 In their most recent outing, the tournament hosts were rocked by a 15-14 loss to Italy, a game they were expected to ease past as a form of confidence booster coming into the World Cup. 
 
 As things stand, Kevin Sinfield and Co. can now react in one of two ways: The shock defeat will either invigorate the English and drive them to prove critics wrong or damage morale too late on to repair. 
 Speaking to BBC Sport , the English captain stated that his side will move on from the result and open with a flourish against Australia. 
 
 If The Old Dart can do just that, they&rsquo;ll have proved themselves as contenders for silverware, which is far from out of their reach given the talent in Steve McNamara&rsquo;s squad. 
 However, it&rsquo;s a case of whether or not that talent can be blended together to produce the goods that England have mostly lacked on the World Cup stage. They have reached just one final in their fairly brief history as individual participants, so it will be some achievement if they are one of the last two teams standing. 
 
 New Zealand 
 New Zealand&rsquo;s rise of recent years has been a great spectacle to watch, but there nevertheless exists a sense of doubt as to whether the Kiwis can win back-to-back World Cups. 
 This tournament will be a test of New Zealand&rsquo;s longevity as a titan of the sport, with Stephen Kearney&rsquo;s side hopeful of creating a dynasty like Australia have held in the last few decades, winning six successive tournaments prior to 2008. 
 
 With France, Samoa and Papua New Guinea around, there&rsquo;s little doubt that New Zealand will be able to make it out of Group B with first place in hand, before also going on to beat whichever Group C graduate they might face in the quarterfinals. 
 In fact, a favourable group means that the Kiwis aren&rsquo;t likely to be truly tested until the semis, with a place in the final a firm possibility for the reigning champions, who warmed up for the competition with a 50-0 drubbing of the Cook Islands last week. 
 
 Australia 
 Call it presumptuous, but one could say that Australia&rsquo;s entire World Cup campaign rests on how they fare against England in their opening encounter. 
 
 Easily the most difficult fixture of their Group A trials, a win would mean the path is set for the Kangaroos to glide their way to the final, although a meeting with Samoa, France or even England again could upset it. 
 NRL talent is thriving as well as ever, and after being stung in last year&rsquo;s final Tim Sheens will be eager to set the record straight, reminding the world who is the ruling power in rugby league. 
 With the likes of Johnathan Thurston, Greg Inglis and Andrew Fifita bolstering their ranks substantially, the Aussies have arguably the finest squad heading into the tournament and are likely to show a bit of flair en route to the decider, before eventually going on to win the whole thing.
----
Fantasy Premier League 2013 Week 9: Best Plays at Each Position Fantasy Premier League is heating up and as we approach Week 9, it's time to look at the best plays at each position. 
 Which players are going to be the best bang for your buck, as well as give you the best production to help you win? Which players can pretty much guarantee you victory? 
 We look at the best players at each position and tell you who you have to start in order to win. 
 Read on to find out. 
 Player points according to fantasy.premierleague.com . 
 
 Goalie: Simon Mignolet , Liverpool 
 
 Mignolet has been absolutely fantastic for the Reds this season. The Belgian keeper has 32 saves in eight games and three clean sheets. 
 He is going up against a West Brom team that has not really lit up the scoreboard thus far this season. 
 Mignolet , for my money, has been the best fantasy goalkeeper this year. Liverpool are pretty strong in front of him defensively and the Belgian makes tough saves look routine. 
 West Brom have scored just seven goals, and while they have beaten Liverpool at Anfield in the last two years, Mignolet is the type of goalie who can thwart a vicious attack. 
 Look for Mignolet to post a clean sheet against West Brom and help lead your team to victory. 
 
 Defender: John Terry, Chelsea 
 
 John Terry is a defender who can put up big points. 
 In Week 6, for example, Terry posted 11 points. 
 Chelsea go up against a Manchester City side that, while near the top of Premier League standings, has struggled on the road, beating only an overmatched West Ham club. 
 Terry has a goal and an assist on the season. I expect Man City to continue their struggles on the road and for Terry potentially to pop up with a goal. He is a safe play this week and is probably a safe play every week going forward. 
 
 Midfielder: Robbie Brady, Hull City 
 
 Robbie Brady has been on fire in the past couple of weeks. 
 The Irish winger has 13 points in his last three games. On the season, he has three goals and an assist. 
 It's true that Hull City have struggled this season, and they are coming off a bad loss to Everton . 
 But fantasy, oftentimes, is not about team performance. It's about individual performance and Brady has proven to be a solid and consistent fantasy option. 
 You can't go wrong with Brady. 
 
 Forward: Loic Remy, Newcastle 
 
 Loic Remy has 23 points in his last three matches. Given that he's going up against a pitiful Sunderland defense, Remy should have a huge game. 
 Remy has scored five goals in six games and has put up a remarkable 18 shots. 
 Sunderland have given up a pitiful 20 goals this season and are probably the worst team in the Premier League. 
 Remy should have plenty of room to run and create and could score multiple goals. He is an electric offensive player and, given the matchup, this could be his most productive week.
----
Aston Villa vs. Everton: Date, Time, Live Stream and Preview Everton  could crack the top five or even top four with three points on their trip to Aston Villa this Saturday. 
 The Toffees are on 15 points, just a point off Tottenham Hotspur in fifth and Manchester City in fourth. They're also behind Southampton, who's got the advantage on goal differential.  Everton  will need a lot of help if they're going to jump up in the table, but it can be done. 
 Villa, on the other hand, are trying to claw their way back into the top half. They sit 13th in the table, on 10 points. They're a point below Newcastle, who are in 10th. Much like with  Everton , you could see the  Villans  take a big jump this weekend. They'll just need a lot of help. 
 This has the potential to be a very entertaining game between two clubs that will look at this match as a golden opportunity to pick up three points. 
 
 When: Saturday, Oct. 26 at 10 a.m. ET; 3 p.m. BST 
 Where: Villa Park, Birmingham, England 
 Live Stream: NBC Sports Live Extra (U.S.) 
 Odds (courtesy of  Bloomberg  Sports ) 
 Aston Villa win: 28.2 percent 
  Everton  win: 45.2 percent 
 Draw: 26.6 percent 
 
 Top Storyline: Which Belgian Will Prevail? 
 
 This match features a battle of wills between two strikers fighting for a starting spot in the Belgian national team. It must be so nice to be Marc  Wilmots . He can opt for either  Romelu   Lukaku  or Christian  Benteke , depending on the situation. Both guys are among the best strikers in England. 
  Everton  have a nice statistical breakdown of the two. 
 
 While  Lukaku  and  Benteke  won't be going up against one another head to head, watching how these two strikers operate will be a match all by itself. Aside from their respective desires to simply win the match, each guy has a chance to demonstrate to Wilmots he's the superior player. 
 
 Going back to the match itself, the player with the better game will likely swing the momentum in favor of his club. 
  Benteke 's performance will be the much more important. He made his return from injury last week against Tottenham as a substitute. That's great news for Villa because the 22-year-old forward makes the attack go, as was established while he was replaced by the ineffective  Libor   Kozak  in the lineup. If  Benteke 's off his game, Aston Villa will have a difficult time in the final third. 
  Everton  aren't as dependent on  Lukaku . They're much better when he's firing on all cylinders, but should he be neutralized, the Toffees could still have enough to see the match out. 
 
 Prediction 
 This match is a tactical battle between the possession style of  Everton  and the lethal counter-attacking of Aston Villa. Both clubs could be playing into each other's hands. 
 
 Roberto Martinez will be all too happy to control the match, as it limits Gabriel Agbonlahor and Andreas Weimann's opportunities to get forward down the flanks. On the other side, Paul Lambert will allow his team to cede possession and bide their time before quickly launching on the counter whenever there's an opening. 
 Good luck trying to predict the result. You could foresee an  Everton  win just as easily as you could an Aston Villa win. Neither team has a distinct advantage. While the Toffees have the slight edge in terms of talent, Villa get the added boost of playing at home. 
 Coincidentally, the past six matches between these two clubs have featured a win for each side and four draws, via  WhoScored  . With so little separating the sides, expect another draw. 
 Aston Villa 1,  Everton  1
----
Liverpool vs. West Brom: Date, Time, Live Stream, TV Info and Preview Liverpool have to be thrilled with their start to the season, as the Reds currently have 17 points and are third on the table despite a summer of Luis Suarez drama and the aforementioned striker suspended to start the season. 
 West Brom have to be thrilled with how they've responded to a slow start. The club lost two of their first three Premier League games but haven't lost since, taking nine points from their past five matches that included a win over Manchester United and a draw with Arsenal. 
 Now, these teams face with Liverpool looking to remain near the top of the table and West Brom hoping to crack into the top 10 by stealing points at Anfield. Let's break this contest down. 
 
 When : Saturday, October 26 at 10 a.m. ET (3 p.m. BST ) 
 Where : Anfield, Liverpool, England 
 Watch : NBC Sports Live Extra 
 Odds : Liverpool (57.2 percent), West Brom (19.3 percent) and draw (23.5 percent), according to Bloomberg Sports 
 
 Key Storylines 
 
 The story of the season thus far for Liverpool is the play of forwards Daniel Sturridge (seven goals, two assists in eight league games) and Luis Suarez (three goals and an assist in three league games). Outside of perhaps only Olivier Giroud and Mesut Ozil , Sturridge and Suarez have formed the most dangerous attacking duo in the Premier League thus far. 
 And while he won't be back in time for the match against West Brom , electrifying No. 10 Philippe Coutinho should be back in time to face Arsenal next week, according to Mike Whalley of ESPN : 
 
 Reds manager Brendan Rodgers has ruled out the possibility of the playmaker making his return against West Brom at Anfield on Saturday. 
 However, Coutinho is back in training, and Rodgers is looking forward to having him back in the side. 
 &ldquo;He might just be short for this weekend,&rdquo; Rodgers said. &ldquo;You always miss quality. He&rsquo;s rejoined the training group. Philippe&rsquo;s joined in with the team on a non-contact basis, and I would think after the weekend, he&rsquo;ll be fine." 
 
 Speaking of Arsenal, could the Reds overlook West Brom with a date at the Emirates Stadium on tap? It's always possible, given how important that match will be atop the table, but with leaders like Steven Gerrard, you would expect the Reds to be focused in front of their home crowd. 
 Gerrard isn't just a leader, however&mdash;he's been excellent this campaign, earning an average match rating of 7.69 from WhoScored .com , tied for fifth in the Premier League. 
 West Brom aren't going to bombard any teams with offense&mdash;they've scored just seven goals in eight league games&mdash;but they have been playing excellent defense, conceding just six goals on the season, fourth best in the EPL. 
 Expect them to play a compact, conservative game and hope to spring forward when given the opportunity on the counter-attack. Recent history is on their side, too&mdash;they've won at Anfield two seasons in a row . 
 
 Prediction 
 
 West Brom don't concede often, but neither do Liverpool&mdash;they've given up just seven goals this season. West Brom will try to contain Suarez and Sturridge as much as possible, but it's hard to see them providing much of a scare for keeper Simon Mignolet either. 
 Expect Liverpool to earn the lion's share of possession and spend much of this game trying to unlock West Brom 's defense. It won't be the prettiest win for the Reds, but they'll take it. 
 Liverpool win, 1-0.
----
EPL Week 9 Fixtures: TV Schedule and Live Stream Information for Matches The English Premier League got off to a surprising start and has only set the stage for an epic finish to the 2013-14 campaign. 
 With Arsenal shocking the world of soccer by propelling to the top of the table and Liverpool turning into a formidable title contender, storylines have emerged that few would've suspected heading into the start of the season. 
 Let's take a look at the television schedule and live stream information for Week 9 of the Premier League. 
 
 
 Live Stream: NBC Live Extra 
 
 
 
 Manchester United vs. Stoke City 
 United continued to struggle last weekend against Southampton in a 1-1 draw, and the Red Devils simply running out of time to get back in the hunt for defending their title. 
 They received some good fortune from the schedule in Week 9, with a home contest in Old Trafford against the tanking Stoke City. 
 Stoke have just eight points in eight games, while David Moyes' club is noticeably close to them at 11 points. 
 It's tough to put the finger on exactly what is causing problems for Manchester United, but they better figure it out soon. 
 If they're unable to get three points against a club like Stoke at home, it's a daunting sign for the rest of the season. 
 
 Crystal Palace vs. Arsenal 
 
 The Gunners have been the story of the league this year, leading with 19 points after eight games. They never looked better than they did last weekend against Norwich, winning 4-1. 
 Arsenal should continue to roll into the weekend, coming off a hard-fought loss to Borussia Dortmund in midweek and heading to face Crystal Palace. 
 Palace have three points in eight games, and boast an awful minus-11 goal differential to Arsenal's plus-nine. 
 Unless Aaron Ramsey, Mesut Ozil and the revamped Arsenal offense suddenly stop clicking, the Gunners should easily take care of Crystal Palace and keep their backs pushed firmly on the wall of relegation. 
 
 Chelsea vs. Manchester City 
 
 Under a new era with Jose Mourinho, Chelsea got off to a sluggish start, but has won three straight lopsided affairs in all competitions. 
 That winning streak will be tested mightily over the weekend, as the Blues host Manchester City at Stamford Bridge. 
 Also going through a managerial transition, City has the highest goal differential at plus-11 but sit one point behind Chelsea at 16 points. Each club is a win and an Arsenal loss (unlikely as it may be) away from holding a share of the league lead. 
 This is undoubtedly the matchup of the weekend, and should be a telling factor as to who will be contending for the title down the stretch of the 2013-14 season.
----
Crystal Palace vs. Arsenal: Date, Time, Live Stream, TV Info and Preview For Arsenal, the Premier League season couldn't be going much better. 
 Despite being hit by a rash of injuries, the Gunners are currently atop the league table with 19 points and are second top of the league scorers with 18 goals. 
 For Crystal Palace, things couldn't be much worse. They are currently 19th in the table with just three points, have allowed 17 goals (second-worse record in the league) and parted ways with manager Ian Holloway this week. 
 Suffice to say, this contest could get out of hand. 
 
 When : Saturday, October 26 at 7:45 a.m. ET (12:45 p.m. BST ) 
 Where : Selhurst Park, London, England 
 Watch : NBC Sports Network; NBC Sports Live Extra; BT Sport 1 (UK) 
 Odds : Arsenal (59.3 percent), Crystal Palace (17.3 percent) and draw (23.4 percent), according to Bloomberg Sports 
 
 Key Storylines 
 
 
 The Gunners come into this game after drubbing Norwich City 4-1 behind arguably the goal of the season from Jack Wilshere . If you haven't seen it, enjoy this absolute thing of beauty. 
 Arsenal have been paced this season by the play of Aaron Ramsey (8.14), Mesut Ozil (8.0) and Olivier Giroud (7.98), currently the three highest-ranked players in WhoScored .com's average match ratings for the Premier League. 
 And now that Santi Cazorla is back in action, the Gunners are truly fierce in the attack, even with their top wingers ( Theo Walcott , Alex Oxlade -Chamberlain and Lukas Podolski ) all sidelined to injury. 
 For Crystal Palace, the question remains about where the goals will come from. The team has scored just six in the Premier League (tied for 18th) and only Dwight Gayle (two goals) has gotten on the scoresheet more than once. 
 And with Arsenal hoping to erase the sting of a midweek loss to Borussia Dortmund in the Champions League, it's not hard to see Palace being overwhelmed in this contest. 
 
 Prediction 
 
 This game doesn't seem to be a question of whether Arsenal will win but by how many goals they'll win. 
 Crystal Palace have been outscored 13-2 in their last five league matches and their lone points on the year came in a win over Sunderland , a team that has been historically bad in starting the season. 
 
 Meanwhile, Arsenal have taken 10 points in four away fixtures in the league thus far, and the addition of Ozil appears to have taken them from the realm of a team fighting for a top-four finish to legitimate title contenders. 
 And this isn't the sort of match that title contenders lose. Arsenal win easily, 3-0.
----
Barcelona vs. Real Madrid: Date, Time, Live Stream, TV Info and Preview Barcelona and Real Madrid are separated by just three points heading into the first El Clasico clash of the La Liga campaign. 
 The rivals are always expected to battle for the league title and both are on track to do exactly that, with Atletico Madrid also in the mix. 
 The Barca attack was virtually unstoppable in the early stages of the new campaign. They have only scored one goal over the past two matches, however, which should give Real an extra boost of confidence as they arrive to Camp Nou . 
 While Barcelona are going through a brief lull, los  Blancos are coming off an impressive midweek victory over Juventus . It makes for an intriguing rivalry clash as Barca attempt to rebound and Real try to keep their recent hot streak alive. 
 Let's take a look at all the important viewing information for the latest edition of El Clasico , followed by a breakdown of the top storyline and a match prediction. 
 
 
 Where : Camp Nou in Barcelona, Spain 
 When : Saturday, Oct. 26 at 12 p.m. ET (5 p.m. BST ) 
 Watch : beIN Sport and Sky Sports 2 
 Live Stream : beIN Sport Play 
 
 Match Forecast (via Bloomberg Sports ) 
 Barcelona: 56.2 percent 
 Real Madrid: 25.8 percent 
 Draw: 18 percent 
 
 Top Storyline : Which star will capture the spotlight in El Clasico ? 
 
 Don't underestimate the importance of the season's first El Clasico , even though there's plenty of time left in the campaign. 
 The difference between a six-point gap and being level after 10 matches is huge for both clubs. 
 So expect both managers, Gerardo Martino and Carlo Ancelotti , to put together the best available lineup for the match, despite the fact both sides are in the midst of very busy stretches. The full star power of both sides should be on display. 
 
 For Barcelona, the squad is highlighted by the dynamic attacking duo of Lionel Messi and Neymar , who have been able to forge a successful partnership quickly. 
 The Brazilian's willingness to adapt to a playmaking role has helped that process. 
 Of course, while Messi and Neymar dominate the headlines, the midfield is still the foundation of Barca 's success. Andres Iniesta and Xavi continue to showcase terrific form, which makes the forwards' job much easier. 
 They don't represent as big of an advantage over Real Madrid this season, though. 
 The arrivals of Gareth Bale and Isco have bolstered the talent level in the middle of the pitch for Real and that will certainly come in handy for these rivalry matches. 
 The Blancos will also need a strong showing from Diego Lopez to secure a positive result. For Real to emerge from Camp Nou with a win, the goalkeeper will probably have to outshine all of the aforementioned superstars. 
 
 Prediction 
 
 Both clubs know how much is at stake in this early matchup. The only question mark is whether that leads the attacking stars for each side to push forward aggressively, leading to a high-scoring thriller, or the rivals playing a little more passive to avoid a costly mistake. 
 Given their minor scoring slump, Barcelona will probably prefer the former as they attempt to get Messi and Co. going again. It should lead to an exciting back-and-forth encounter with plenty of scoring opportunities at both ends. 
 In the end, playing at Camp Nou gives Barcelona the slight edge. 
 Barcelona 3, Real Madrid 2
----
Manchester United vs. Stoke City: Date, Time, Live Stream, TV Info and Preview An inspired performance from Wayne Rooney allowed Manchester United to earn a midweek Champions League victory over Real Sociedad . Now, the club's search for top form continues heading into a Premier League meeting with Stoke City. 
 United are hoping Robin van Persie will be ready to return after missing the triumph over Sociedad due to nagging injuries . If the Red Devils are going to rebound from a slow start, they need all of their stars, including the talented striker, to stay healthy. 
 As for Stoke, the trend of strong defensive play paired with major attacking struggles has continued. The Potters have failed to score in their past three matches, a pair of 1-0 defeats and a scoreless draw. They will try to end the frustrating stretch against United. 
 Let's take a glance at all of the key information for the Premier League clash, followed by an examination of the top storyline and a match prediction. 
 
 
 Where : Old Trafford in Greater Manchester, England 
 When : Saturday, Oct. 26 at 10 a.m. ET (3 p.m. BST ) 
 Watch : NBC Sports Network and Setanta Sports 1 
 Live Stream : NBC Sports Live Extra 
 
 Match Forecast (via Bloomberg Sports ) 
 Manchester United: 56.3 percent 
 Stoke City: 19.1 percent 
 Draw: 24.6 percent 
 
 Top Storyline : Can Manchester United begin to make a Premier League charge? 
 
 Heading into the weekend action, United currently sit in eighth place and are eight points off the pace being set by Arsenal. A disappointing start, highlighted by just one home win in four league matches at Old Trafford , has put the club in an early hole. 
 There's still plenty of time to make up ground, of course. Yet, the longer United goes without making up at least some ground is going to make the comeback even tougher. They have already squandered some chances, including a home draw with Southampton last week. 
 
 The next three league matches provide an opportunity. United have winnable matchups with Stoke and Fulham before taking on Arsenal. A trio of victories would brighten hopes for a repeat bid by the defending champions. 
 It has to start by taking care of business against Stoke. Having van Persie available is crucial because the Potters are going to hunker down at the back and use their defensive strength in an attempt to further frustrate the Red Devils. 
 If van Persie and Rooney are both in the lineup, United should be able to eventually break down that wall in order to earn three points. Anything less would be another step in the wrong direction. 
 
 Prediction 
 
 Asmir Begovic and the Stoke back line are going to pose a tough test for United. The Potters aren't going to put on much attacking pressure, but they force every opponent to work hard if they are going to earn all three points. 
 United must offset that strength at the back by playing an up-tempo style to ensure they are able to generate a lot of chances. If they sit back and are simply happy to control possession without pushing forward aggressively, the edge swings to Stoke. 
 Ultimately, United should do enough to earn the win, but it won't be easy. 
 Manchester United 2, Stoke City 0
----
Roger Federer: Victory over Grigor Dimitrov Could Spur Return to Form Maybe, just maybe, 2013 won't be a complete wash for Roger Federer . 
 And if the Swiss legend is to have a significant impact on the tournaments he enters the last few weeks of the season, perhaps he could look back at his quarterfinal win over one of the game's bright young talents, Grigor Dimitrov , in Switzerland this week. 
 In their first career encounter, Federer defeated the young Bulgarian in straight sets. This comes on the heels of Dimitrov exhibiting signs of being able to handle expectations by winning his first singles title last week in Stockholm and his first two matches in Basel. 
 Dimitrov , or "Baby Fed" as he's referred to in a number of circles, had his chances to take the second set, but couldn't close it out. Federer took advantage and won against a player whose game almost seems a mirror image of his own. 
 It has to be an encouraging sign for the Swiss great to win a significant match over someone coming into the encounter on a seven-match winning streak. 
 A streak of that size, however meager, is something Federer would've liked to experience this season, especially at the Grand Slam level. But whether it was rust, injury or the elevated level of play his opponents carry to the court, it wasn't meant to be. 
 Federer entered the Swiss Indoors with only one tournament victory all year, an anomaly from what has been the norm for a decade. In fact, he's only made two singles finals in 2013. 
 But he's a step closer now to adding to that result. If anything, a win over a young player like Dimitrov in the best form of his short career shows that there is still evidence Federer is poised for continued success in '13 and running into next year.
----
2014 MLB Free Agency: 5 Keys to Spending Money Wisely The worst-to-first turnaround that has brought the Boston Red Sox to the 2013 World Series is largely attributable to their wise free-agent spending. Following the same keys they did this coming offseason could elevate most teams to the same heights in 2014. 
 General managers all have the same aspirations&mdash;acquire as much talent as possible for the lowest price. 
 The few that succeed from that perspective properly blend advanced statistics with personal evaluations; they factor in positional scarcity and only take calculated risks. 
 Specific spending strategies can vary a bit from front office to front office, but these are the constant guidelines that ought to be followed universally. Begin Slideshow
----
Boise State vs. BYU: 10 Things We Learned in Broncos' Loss Boise State is now 5-3 on the season overall and 3-1 in the MWC after a painful 37-20 loss at the hands of of the BYU Cougars. 
 The Cougars dominated the Broncos in nearly every area of the game Friday night, and it was the first win for BYU over Boise State in four attempts. 
 The only upside for Boise State is that this wasn't a Mountain West Conference game, and the experience probably helps the Broncos new quarterback Grant Hedrick going into the rest of the MWC schedule. 
 Still, a loss like this is painful, and lessons or not, it had to sting a bit. 
 Let's look at what we learned in the Broncos loss to BYU, and let's try to figure out what it might mean for the remainder of their 2013 season. Begin Slideshow
----
Miami Football: Hurricanes Finally Ready for a Return to the National Spotlight? After everything the Miami Hurricanes have experienced the past several days, this weekend's home showdown against Wake Forest almost seems like an afterthought. 
 Over a six-day span Miami had a monster comeback at North Carolina, jumped to No. 7 in the first BCS rankings, was informed the NCAA was set to deliver a ruling and, a day later, a three-year dark cloud that hovered over the program finally blew over. 
 Prosperity has alluded the Hurricanes for the better part of the past decade. Losses and coaching changes preceded the NCAA bombshell, and since then, Miami has simply been hanging on and holding out for better days. 
 After head coach Al Golden inked his second recruiting class in 2012, the nation got a taste of what was to come. "We need to stand up, we need to fight. Time to stop having an inferiority complex," Golden said to Dave Hyde at the Sun Sentinel just after Signing Day. 
 "We've got to start thinking like we're the University of Miami again. That's what we're fighting. That's what we're trying to get back to." 
 
 It's Been a While 
 Golden came to Miami armed with a 300-page "Deserve Victory" binder . What felt like an early motivational tool eventually became the blueprint for this current group of Hurricanes&mdash;all of whom have completely in bought to Golden's approach. 
 That commitment has been the key component to this year's unexpected turnaround. 
 
 Golden made the Hurricanes off limits to the media this week, and with good reason. Miami needs to collectively exhale, regroup and eliminate distractions as they enter the second half of the 2013 schedule. 
 These are unchartered waters for UM&mdash;both in regards to the lofty position in the polls, as well as the lack of a hovering NCAA presence. Saturday's matchup with Wake Forest is Golden's 31st game as Miami's head coach and his first without any off-the-field drama. 
 For Miami, the newfound success couldn't have come at a better time. This season's 6-0 start, paired with the NCAA closure, could signal a rebirth in Coral Gables. Recruiting remains on a roll, with 26 verbal commitments for what is currently the No. 4 class in the nation&mdash;a number that should improve if the Hurricanes can close strong and reel in some on-the-fence top talent down the stretch. 
 
 Canes Weren't Ready Last Time Around 
 Prior to this week's No. 7 ranking, the Hurricanes last bout with this type of success came in October 2009. After a 5-1 start, Miami (No. 8 AP/No. 10 BCS ) welcomed Clemson (3-3) and fell in overtime, which derailed a season that finished at 9-4. 
 The Hurricanes reached No. 3 in the BCS back in November 2005, weeks after topping then-third-ranked Virginia Tech on the road. But they were were upset at home late in the season by Georgia Tech. Again Miami didn't have the resiliency to recover and ended the season getting throttled by LSU in the Peach Bowl, 40-3. 
 The higher the stakes, the more the Hurricanes have crumbled since joining the ACC in 2004. 
 A program that once dominated all competition, knocked off top-ranked teams in its sleep , won four national championships in a nine-year span (1983, 1987, 1989 and 1991), Miami as of late has been a squad that plays down to the level of competition. 
 Look no further than past short-lived stints in the upper BCS rankings for proof. 
 
 Why 2013 and Beyond Will Be Different 
 For Miami, there's no bigger game-changer than the NCAA investigation finally being wrapped up and punishment delivered. 
 Self-imposing bans for two straight bowl games, sitting out last season's ACC Championship game and dealing with negative recruiting tactics from rivals has hurt the Hurricanes more than any of the penalties levied this week. 
 
 Nine total scholarships lost over the next three seasons was the verdict, with the NCAA acknowledging that UM's self-punishment efforts were "unprecedented." 
 Miami will carry no more than 82 scholarship players in 2014, 2015 and 2016, instead of the maximum allotment of 85. By The Miami Herald 's count , this year's Hurricanes currently boast 75 scholarship athletes, meaning that even on probation the next three years, UM will have a deeper, more talented roster, with recruiting trending upwards. 
 These in-repair Hurricanes continue taking on the resilient personality of their third-year head coach, displaying character in the face of adversity, such as in recent come-from-behind victories. 
 No. 7 ranking? So what. At this point, it's nothing more than a distraction. Nothing's been accomplished and, as reported by The Miami Herald's Manny Navarro, Golden continues to drive home that message : 
 There is cheese all around them. Don&rsquo;t take the cheese. Don&rsquo;t take the trap. You have a guy here or there that all of a sudden they&rsquo;re seduced by it. They want to hear about it. They want to talk about it. It has nothing to do with the outcome. Doing your job, preparing, asking questions, being engaged, doing your role&mdash;all those little things, that&rsquo;s what we need to focus on. That&rsquo;s what we need leadership for. 
 Regarding the recent ascension in the polls and outside hype: 
 We&rsquo;re going to continue to ignore it...I need the coaches to do that. I need the players to do that. I need anybody that touches a Miami Hurricane to do that. Families, academic support, strength and conditioning, training room, it doesn &rsquo;t matter. We got to make sure we&rsquo;re all on the same page and keeping the guys focused on what we need to do because the rest of it doesn &rsquo;t matter. The rest of it will take care of itself if we take care of our business and do our job every day. 
 The biggest difference between present-day Miami and where this program stood half-a-decade back? The guy in charge, the message being delivered and the players internalizing that message. 
 Where the Hurricanes got big headed in years past&mdash;as proven by late-season collapses anytime success reared its head&mdash;this group takes wins in stride, knowing each is nothing more than a step closer to an ultimate goal. 
 Upon beating Georgia Tech in early October and entering the AP Top 10 for the first time in four years, Miami players remained ho-hum about the achievement. 
 "It doesn 't matter," sophomore running back Duke Johnson told Susan Miller Degnan and The Miami Herald . "All that could be gone with one mistake, one game, and that's something we're trying not to pay too much attention to. If we lose a Coastal [Division] game, all that doesn 't mean anything." 
 This current attitude is what this program had been missing, and it is precisely what Miami needs with Wake Forest on deck. A business-like approach should allow the Hurricanes to dispose of the Demon Deacons before turning all focus to next week's road trip to Florida State. No more bye weeks and zero time to overthink . Get the job done, stick with the process and view the Seminoles as another foe on the roster. 
 With a one-game-at-a-time mentality and the NCAA matters in the rear view, Miami is precisely where it needs to be, inching itself back to national prominence. 
 
 Follow Chris Bello on Twitter @ allCanesBlog
----
Jim Buss Denies Rumor That Lakers Will Allow Kobe Bryant to Become Free Agent Apparently Kobe Bryant won't hit the free-agent market, after all. 
 T.J. Simers of the Orange County Register recently reported that Los Angeles Lakers executive vice president Jim Buss was planning on letting Bryant hit free agency before later re-signing him in the name of financial flexibility. 
 But Buss put an end to that rumor, telling ESPN's Ramona Shelburne that Bryant won't become a free agent at all: 
 
 "I want to put an end to any speculation that we would allow Kobe to become a free agent," Buss told ESPNLosAngeles .com on Friday night. "That's not going to happen. Kobe is a top priority for us. He's a Laker legend and always will be. I don't think we're done winning championships with him yet. 
 "[Lakers general manager] Mitch Kupchak and [Bryant's agent] Rob Pelinka have been talking, but with him being hurt, it has slowed the process some. I don't know when it'll get done, but I have faith in Rob and Mitch to work things out." 
 
 Buss seems pretty adamant, but when it comes down to it, it really doesn't matter whether or not Bryant hits free agency for some period of time. The end game is simple: Kobe returning to the Lakers for the 2014-15 season. 
 Bryant has spent all 17 of his legendary seasons with the Lakers, and the chances of him ending his career&mdash;or even taking a detour&mdash;with any other team are somewhere in the range between slim and none. 
 
 The thing to pay attention to in all of this is whether or not Bryant, who is set to make just over $30 million this season, takes a significant pay cut. 
 Los Angeles currently has just three players&mdash;Steve Nash, Nick Young and Robert Sacre &mdash;on the books for the next season, and if Bryant allows them, the Lakers will have lots of room to make a splash in free agency and add some talented pieces. 
 How Bryant returns from his Achilles injury will also play a role in all of this. He's focused solely on working his way back right now, so contract talk has unsurprisingly been put on the backburner .
----
BYU vs. Boise State: Cougars Crush Broncos as Cody Hoffman Sets Receiving Record The Boise State Broncos and BYU Cougars had met three times previously, with Boise State coming away the victors each time, often by the narrowest of margins. A rivalry is starting to form between the two teams, with a series between the two scheduled to run for at least another decade. 
 On this night, though, BYU got its first win in the series in rather emphatic fashion. The Cougars won 37-20 , in a game that was honestly even more lopsided than the final score would suggest. 
 BYU came out in the first half much more prepared and pumped up than Boise State and entered the locker room at halftime with a 24-3 lead. 
 With less than a minute remaining in the first half, BYU QB Taysom Hill found WR Cody Hoffman in the end zone for a four-yard touchdown pass. It was especially significant, as it was the 31st touchdown reception of Hoffman's BYU career, moving him past Austin Collie for first on the school's all-time touchdown receptions list. 
 This is the second week in a row in which Hoffman has broken a school record, as he passed Dennis Pitta in last week's game against Houston for most receptions in BYU history. 
 In the second half, Boise State did manage a little more offense, but 10 of those 17 points were due in large part to just two plays, a 61-yard run by Jay Ajayi that set up a field goal and a 47-yard pass from Grant Hedrick to Aaron Burks that led to a touchdown. 
 While Boise State put up a respectable yardage total of 499 yards, the BYU defense was absolutely ruthless in forcing turnovers, getting an interception and forcing and recovering three fumbles. 
 While BYU's defense was causing turnovers, the Cougars offense did a superb job at preventing them, as the Broncos' defense wasn't able to force a single turnover. About the only excitement the Boise State defense produced was when safety Dillon Lukehart got ejected for a vicious targeting foul on Hoffman in the end zone. The foul saved a touchdown but cost the defense Lukehart for the second half of this game and the first half of their next game. 
 Hill continued his growth as BYU's QB, notching 339 yards and three touchdowns passing and another 69 yards and a touchdown rushing. He also significantly lessened the number of big hits he took, which is important given his injury history. 
 BYU RB Jamaal Williams continued to be a workhorse, racking up 102 yards on 21 carries. He now has 728 yards rushing on the season and looks poised to be the first BYU running back to rush for 1,000 yards in a season since Harvey Unga in 2009, despite having missed about two full games' worth of playing time this season already due to injury. 
 The BYU tight ends had their best game of the season after having little impact at all up to this game. Kaneakua Friel, Devin Mahina and Marcus Mathews combined for eight receptions for 102 yards. 
 Overall, it was a convincing win for BYU, who put to rest any doubt over which team is better this season. 
 The win gave BYU their sixth of the season, making them bowl eligible. Shortly after the game, BYU accepted a bid to the Kraft Fight Hunger Bowl in San Francisco, to be matched up against a Pac-12 team that will be determined later.
----
Ranking the Top 100 Players in the NBA Heading into 2013-14 Season LeBron James. Kobe Bryant . Derrick Rose . 
 The list of household names in the NBA just goes on and on, and I could easily write so many names down that you'd fall asleep before getting to the actual rankings of the Top 100 players. Due to the five-on-five experience and the exposed nature of the on-court athletes, the Association just promotes the presence of superstars better than most other sports. 
 But the cream still rises to the top. 
 The NBA is now filled with more quality players than ever before, and these are still the best of the best. 
 Think about it. More players enter the league via the draft, by coming overseas and as undrafted free agents than the number of players who retire or fade away into obscurity each and every year. The league has to get deeper. 
 It just makes it all the more impressive for a young player to work into the Top 100. 
 So, who do you think is undervalued or overvalued going into what's sure to be an exciting season? Begin Slideshow
----
UFC Fight Night 30 Live Results: Play-by-Play, Highlights for Machida vs. Munoz The UFC returns to England, giving fans a matchup between top-10 middleweight Mark Munoz and former light heavyweight champion Lyoto Machida , who is making his 185-pound debut. Past that is a card filled with most of the UFC's top British talent, including Ross Pearson, Jimi Manuwa and Norman Parke. 
 The card is as follows: 
 Main Card (Fox Sports 2) 
 Lyoto Machida vs. Mark Munoz Ross Pearson vs. Melvin Guillard Jimi Manuwa vs. Ryan Jimmo Norman Parke vs. Jon Tuck Alessio Sakara vs. Nicholas Musoke Phil Harris vs. John Lineker 
 Preliminary Card (Facebook, YouTube) 
 Al Iaquinta vs. Dennis Hallman Luke Barnatt vs. Andrew Craig Rosi Sexton vs. Jessica Andrade Andy Ogle vs. Cole Miller Jimy Hettes vs. Robert Whiteford Bradley Scott vs. Michael Kuiper
----
Fantasy Football Week 8: Hot Names to Grab in Face of Byes and Injuries Week 7 around the NFL served as quite an unfriendly reminder that football is, indeed, a contact sport, and the human body can sometimes be quite fragile. Key injuries to many starting players marred what was, overall, a very good week of football in the league. 
 Among the notables to be lost for the 2013 season, Indianapolis Colts wide receiver Reggie Wayne and St. Louis Rams quarterback Sam Bradford have both been diagnosed with torn anterior cruciate ligaments. 
 As if Houston's season wasn't already headed in the wrong direction, linebacker Brian Cushing both broke his leg and tore ligaments in his knee, leaving him done for the season. And running back Arian Foster tweaked his hamstring, the same injury giving Foster fits in the preseason. 
 With all of these injuries comes a major fantasy impact. Many fans would have had Bradford, Wayne, or Foster as No. 1 starters on their teams. Whether out because of injury or your favorite player's team has a bye this weekend&mdash;we'll dive in and take a look at a few of the players who may just be able to help fill the figurative shoes left in your lineup. Begin Slideshow
----
Atlanta Falcons: Breaking Down the Offensive Line's Performance in 2013 The Atlanta Falcons have a reputation for having a horrible offensive line in 2013. And it's not 100 percent unfounded. However, it's a false narrative with how the line has been improving every week. 
 The opening group was Sam Baker, Justin Blalock, Peter Konz , Garrett Reynolds and Lamar Holmes. And outside of Baker getting hurt and Jeremy Trueblood being brought in to start at right tackle with him out, the Falcons have kept the same group in there the whole season. 
 And the group has been improving from week to week. In order to see it keep improving, let's break down how the line has done so far and give it a plan of action for the rest of the season. 
 
 
 Pro Football Focus Grades 
 While left tackle has been very bad the first three games of the season, the Falcons have finally shored it up somewhat over the past three games. And with both guards performing well, the Falcons just need Konz to step up his game as a run blocker in the middle of the line to an average level. 
 At right tackle, the combination of Trueblood and Holmes has performed much better than expected, but pass blocking still leaves a bit to be desired. If that can also get to an NFL average level, the Falcons could keep Matt Ryan upright. 
 As it sits right now, the Falcons offensive line has underperformed in run blocking as a whole on the left side. And it has been horrible at pass blocking at the tackle spots. However, Holmes has been much better in pass blocking the past three games than Baker was at the start of the season. 
 
 
 Quarterback Disruption Breakdown 
 In looking at the total disruptions, the Falcons offensive line has given up way too many with 91 total. However, that number has gone down quite a bit throughout the season. Throughout the season, the Falcons have improved in the amount of pressure they has allowed on Matt Ryan. 
 With Holmes improving every week despite which side he plays and the interior of the line just improving every week period, the Falcons are giving Ryan a cleaner pocket. Once the tackles start to play every game like the one they had against the Buccaneers (one pressure allowed from each side), then the offensive line will be back to where it was in 2012. 
 
 
 Running Effectiveness Breakdown 
 The right end run stats are a bit skewed because of the 55-yard run by Steven Jackson in the opener. But even then, the line has pushed forward for a 3.65 or more average per carry on the right side of the line and under 3.00 on almost the entire left side of the line. 
 A switch from the current man blocking-heavy scheme to a zone-blocking scheme could be extremely beneficial for the offense. The Falcons have the quickness on the line, and they definitely have guys up front who would be intelligent enough to make the switch. 
 But right now, whatever they are trying to do isn't working. Jackson coming back could end up being the spark the running game needs to block better against the run. But with how they've played so far, the only real thing that could improve the run blocking is a scheme switch or Konz getting his act together in the run game. 
 
 The Best Plan of Action for the Remainder of 2013 
 
 Left and Right Tackle 
 While Baker has the most experience at the left tackle spot on the team, Holmes has played the best there this season. The Falcons need to let Baker get 100 percent healthy, because Holmes can be at a minimum serviceable for the Falcons until he returns. 
 If Baker returns to his career-best 2012 form, Holmes can move back to right tackle and learn how to play there effectively. But if he can't, the Falcons should look into having Baker compete with Trueblood on the opposite side of the field. 
 Trueblood has been effective in the run game for the Falcons at right tackle, but so has Holmes. If the Falcons do get Baker to return to his 2012 form, having Trueblood play the sixth offensive lineman role with Holmes continuing to learn and improve on the job is the best plan of action. 
 
 
 Left Guard, Center and Right Guard 
 At guard, Blalock and Reynolds have been surprisingly good. Reynolds and Blalock have been just average at run blocking, but their pass protection has been excellent. At center, Konz has been average in pass protection but horrible as a run blocker. 
 Konz might have still some issues adjusting from the zone-based blocking scheme he played in at Wisconsin. His lack of functional strength has shown up there and would benefit the most from a switch. While the other pair has been effective all around and could play in either scheme. 
 
 The combination of Blalock, Konz and Reynolds has been too effective in pass blocking to bench. The interior three linemen have combined to allow just three sacks, five hits and 23 pressures. Compared to the four sacks, 11 hits and 45 pressures, that's just under half as many total quarterback disruptions. 
 Despite performing well in pass protection, they need to improve their run blocking, or the Falcons will have a very one-dimensional attack again in 2013. It would severely hinder the Falcons' playoff chances if they can't develop the running game. 
 And that's something they'll have to do from the inside. If they do decide to change the scheme to a zone-blocking run game, the Falcons could use their more athletic offensive line talent&mdash;specifically on the interior of the line &mdash; to create that running game needed for a playoff push. 
 
 All stats used are either from  Pro Football Focus' Premium Stats (subscription required),  ESPN ,   CFBStats   or the  NFL . All contract information is courtesy of   Spotrac   and   Rotoworld . 
 Scott Carasik is a Featured Columnist for Bleacher Report. He covers the Atlanta Falcons, NFL and NFL draft. He also runs DraftFalcons .com. 
 Follow @ ScottCarasik
----
Why Jordan Reed Is a Must-Start Fantasy Tight End He's no Jimmy Graham or Tony Gonzalez, but like these fantasy studs, Washington Redskins tight end Jordan Reed is a must-start player in fantasy football leagues. 
 While Reed's season numbers of 26 catches, 298 yards and two touchdowns don't illuminate him in this light, his Week 7 performance certainly does. 
 Against the Chicago Bears , Reed had nine catches, 134 yards and a touchdown. Call him a one-game wonder if you want, but recognize that this one game catapulted Reed up the fantasy scoring list. 
 As we speak, in standard ESPN.com fantasy football leagues , Reed has the 14th-most fantasy points among tight ends. 
 Mind you, Reed has only played in five games. Furthermore, the Week 7 outing is his lone with more than 10 fantasy points. 
 With that said, you could say my faith in Reed is tied to what he'll do and not what he's done. 
 Just a rookie, ESPN's Ron Jaworski  has compared Reed to former New England Patriots tight end Aaron Hernandez, via ESPN.com's John Keim : 
 
 The guy will be sensational. He&rsquo;s one of the guys that jumps off the tape at you. I like to use the word flash. We saw a little bit of it earlier this season but clearly against Chicago I saw a lot more of it. We were talking here, he reminded us on the field of an Aaron Hernandez. He has that kind of wide receiver movement for a big guy. This guy is going to scare the hell out of defenses. 
 
 You may or may not have faith in what Jaworski has to say&mdash; his Colin Kaepernick proclamation isn't looking too good at the moment&mdash;but history is on Reed's side as well. 
 For all the talk about Redskins head coach Mike Shanahan and his success using late-round running backs, his work with unsung tight ends is overlooked. 
 We all know what Shannon Sharpe did under Shanahan, but what about Jeb  Putzier and Tony Scheffler ? 
 In 2004 and 2005,  Putzier had a combined 1,053 receiving yards and two touchdowns. Oh, and he posted those numbers despite only starting a combined nine games in those two seasons. Post-Shanahan, Putzier hasn't surpassed more than 125 yards in any season. 
 As for Scheffler , from 2006 to 2008, he registered 1,480 receiving yards and 12 touchdowns under Shanahan. And he only started 19 of 42 games in that time period. 
 Simply put, Shanahan will get his tight ends the football. In light of Fred Davis and Chris Cooley's production over the years in Washington, that fact hasn't changed. 
 But what do we care about history. We're all focused on the present, right? 
 Well, presently, there aren't many better alternatives to starting Reed. 
 Regardless if you're in a 10- or 12-team league, injuries have limited your starting options at tight end. Just look at some of the players currently ranked ahead of Reed. 
 Both  Jermichael Finley and Owen Daniels are sidelined for the foreseeable future. Then there's Jared Cook and Martellus Bennett. Their respective quarterbacks, Sam Bradford and Jay Cutler , are currently out with injuries. 
 Voila, almost by default, Reed is now a top-10 tight end. But wait, there's more. 
 Not only is Reed the second receiving option on his team, he has a pretty good quarterback throwing him the football in Robert Griffin III . 
 Besides Charles Clay, Jordan Cameron&mdash;who's on, what, his third quarterback ?&mdash;and Delanie Walker, this is a common trait among the top fantasy tight ends. 
 While this threesome has clearly overcome this obstacle, the production has still been sporadic. One week, they're fantasy studs, and the next week, they're on fantasy milk cartons. All of which is a result of their quarterbacks. 
 Seeing that Ryan Tannehill , Jason Campbell and Jake Locker are the quarterbacks for those three, I think Reed will be the more consistent performer going forward. 
 I don't expect Reed to challenge the likes of Vernon Davis and Julius Thomas for fantasy supremacy. But he'll be a mainstay at the top of the fantasy scoring list for tight ends. 
 My advice, get Reed in your starting lineup immediately. With a Week 8 matchup against the Denver Broncos , you can bet that Reed will exploit a Broncos secondary that has allowed the most passing yards in the NFL. 
 Ignore this advice at your leisure, but be forewarned, at the conclusion of the Washington-Denver game on Sunday, I'll have my "I told you so" moment.
----
Metta World Peace Crashes into Kid While Diving into Crowd for Loose Ball Judging by the look on his face, this kid is scarred for life. 
 Thanks to @cjzero for the GIF.
----
Analyzing What Lionel Messi and Cristiano Ronaldo Must Do at El Clasico 2013 Although the play of Lionel   Messi   and Cristiano Ronaldo alone won't win El   Clasico   for either Barcelona or Real Madrid, their performances will help to set the tone. 
 Even clubs with as much talent as   Barca   and Madrid need their star players to perform up to a certain standard, especially in matches as grand as El   Clasico   . 
 Each and every one of   Messi   and Ronaldo's moves will be magnified to the nth degree. If they play well, their performances will go down in history, like   Ronaldinho   's 2005 game that had the Santiago   Bernabeu   crowd applauding him. 
 Here's a comparison of the two up to this point in the season, via   WhoScored  : 
 
 Beyond the glaringly obvious&mdash;score, play well, don't get sent off&mdash;here are two quick things both Ronaldo and   Messi   must do to ensure their respective club wins El   Clasico   . 
 
 Cristiano Ronaldo 
 Use Speed and Physicality to Get in Behind the Defense 
 
 In Real Madrid's 2-1 win over   Juventus   in the Champions League, Ronaldo did a great job of using his positional awareness to score his first goal. As Martin   Caceres   played him onside, the Portuguese winger timed his run perfectly, receiving Angel Di Maria's pass with no defender around and only   Gianluigi     Buffon   to beat. 
 
 That goal was a great example of how Ronaldo's off-the-ball movement can hurt you just as much as when he's got the ball at his feet. He's such an athletic player that he can outrun you and   outjump   you, depending on what the situation calls for. 
 
 That movement will be key against Barcelona. More than likely, Ronaldo's going to be shadowed by two or three defenders at all times. He'll be much better off trying to shake those markers when he's off the ball, rather than taking defenders head on and attempting to dribble past them. 
 Barcelona's back line isn't the most physically imposing. Ronaldo should use that to his advantage by jostling for space, and then when he's got that space, exploiting it with his speed. 
 
 Don't Try to Force Shots When in Tight Spaces 
 
 As great as Ronaldo is, he can be an extremely frustrating player. For the most part, his selfishness on the pitch isn't a major problem. It can become one when he decides to try to force shots that aren't there or dance his way through the defense, only to lose the ball and then remonstrate for a foul. 
 Real Madrid are unlikely to get a ton of shots on goal. They've got to make the most of every attacking opportunity in the final third. 
 What they don't need is Ronaldo cutting in from the left, putting the ball on his right foot and either launching a shot out of play or attempting a shot, only to have it blocked because he's surrounded by defenders and doesn't have a clear look at the goal. 
 Carlo   Ancelotti   will want Ronaldo to have that edge near goal. The important part will be to balance that desire to score with the need to make the smart football move. 
 
 Lionel   Messi   
 Drop Toward Midfield When Not on the Ball 
 
 It's not a news flash to hear   Messi   doesn't hover around the 18-yard box like a normal striker. He operates as more of a No. 10-type creative midfielder. 
 Part of what that serves to do is drag the defenders around the pitch. Opposing players will be too afraid to give   Messi   any sort of space off the ball, so they'll try to close down on him, even when he's near midfield. 
 Now that can be successful for a time. For an entire match, probably not. 
 You'll eventually run into one of two problems. Either your defenders start tiring out toward the end of the match, or they've run out of position, and the opposing team has a numbers advantage in the final third. 
 Should Madrid's centre-backs hold firm in their positions,   Ancelotti   will be asking somebody like   Luka     Modric   ,   Sami     Khedira   or   Asier     Illarramendi   to mark   Messi   , and that could be a recipe for disaster for Madrid. That's why   Messi   is much better dropping as deep as possible. 
 
 Play Off   Neymar   's Runs from Left Flank 
 
 Before the season started, there was a bit of consternation among some   Barca   supporters about how well   Messi   and   Neymar   would jell on the pitch. Both guys were used to being the top dog, and the Brazilian star always looks to run inside, which could cause problems as   Messi   looks to run on goal from the centre-forward position. 
 So far, so good for Barcelona.   Neymar   has become more of a playmaker rather than scorer, while   Messi   remains the target man, or at least as much of a target man as   Barca   can have. 
 
   Messi   would be smart to let   Neymar   cut inside and draw the defense's attention. He doesn't have to be the engine on every attack. 
 This is why the Brazilian star was brought in. He was supposed to add that different dimension and provide another goalscoring threat. As   Neymar   is running in from the left, he's eventually going to drag some defenders over from the center, opening up some space in front of goal. 
   Messi   should use that to his advantage 
 Follow @   JosephZucker
----
Denver Nuggets vs. Chicago Bulls: Recap and Player Grades The Chicago Bulls, in a game for the ages and history on the line, came back from a 19-point deficit to triumph heroically over the Denver Nuggets in front of tens of thousands of adoring fans, as they secured the fourth undefeated preseason in club history and their first championship since Michael Jordan. 
 Tears may have been shed, but there was no rioting in the streets reported. 
 In actuality, the game was only slightly less meaningless because of the fact it did mean an undefeated preseason. The Bulls did come back from a horrid first half, which included missing all 12 of their three-point attempts. 
 It also was last year&rsquo;s playoff hero, Nate Robinson's, return the United Center, so fans couldn&rsquo;t even really boo. 
 However, in the second half, the Bulls took command of the game with a 36-18 third-quarter domination. 
 The Nuggets came back to tie, but the Bulls pulled away at the end to secure their eighth win in as many tries and the &ldquo;preseason championship.&rdquo; 
 There is no word yet on whether the Miami Heat will allow the Bulls to receive their rings, too, before tipoff. Begin Slideshow
----
World Series Game 2: Craig Breslow Latest Pitcher to Throw Away Playoff Game When Boston's Craig  Breslow  airmailed a throw to third base in the seventh inning of Game 2 of the World Series, he allowed the decisive run to score for St. Louis. The result immediately drew the ire of Red Sox fans across the nation. Bostonians have a right to be disappointed by the play, but they should not be surprised, as costly errors by pitchers have become a consistent theme in the MLB postseason. 
 Indeed,  Breslow  could join an unfortunate fraternity of hurlers who have thrown away baseballs, and with them their teams' title hopes. The most famous example is Mariano Rivera of the New York Yankees. He threw Damian Miller's bunt into center field in the ninth inning of Game 7 of the 2001 World Series. The error contributed to the Arizona Diamondback's comeback and stands as one of the few blemishes on Rivera's postseason resume. 
 
 But there have been more recent occasions that were equally important. The Cardinals have won two World Series in the past decade, but it might have been more had their pitchers been able to defend their position. Jason Marquis' bobble of a Craig Biggio bunt in Game 4 of the 2005  NLCS  allowed the winning run to score in a series the Cardinals would eventually lose to the Houston Astros. 
 St. Louis took a 3-1 series lead in the 2012  NLCS  to the Giants, but squandered a chance to end the series at home in Game 5. The key play? Lance Lynn threw away a potential double-play ball in the fourth inning, leading to four unearned runs in a 5-0 loss. When asked about the play, a dejected Lynn could only offer, "Weird things happen," according to ESPN.com's Michael  Knisley  . The Giants won the next two games in San Francisco to advance to the Fall Classic. 
 Even in this year's Series, the Cardinals were victimized in Game 1 when Adam Wainwright  miscommunicated  with his Gold Glove battery mate Yadier Molina and allowed a routine pop-up to drop between them. But St. Louis has also benefited from fielding ineptitude on the part of opposing pitchers. Their 2006 championship was aided by a World Series record of five errors by the Detroit Tigers pitching staff. 
 Finally, the 2009 Yankees waltzed into the World Series after a Game 6 victory over the Los Angeles Angels in the ALCS. A close game was made decidedly less so when Scott Kazmir somehow botched a seemingly  un -botchable thirty-foot throw en route to a 5-2 loss. 
 It's hard to be certain why pitchers continue to make such mistakes. In general, they are worse fielders than the average defensive player, logging a .961 fielding percentage in the 2013 regular season compared to .985 for all other players, according to ESPN.com . The gap is actually greater than the numerical discrepancy shows, however, since pitchers have far less difficult plays to execute than the guys playing behind them. 
 
 The low degree of difficulty might actually be the reason for the errors, though. Pitchers can get psyched out by the apparent easiness of a simple throw to a base, especially since they are so accustomed to making one throw over and over again &mdash; pitches to the plate. 
 Take  Breslow 's error as a case study. While many have questioned whether he should have even attempted a throw in the first place, the video replay clearly shows an opportunity for an out.  Breslow  himself explained, " I looked up and I saw that I definitely had a play there," according to MLB.com . 
 But the moment he picked up the loose ball behind home plate, an error was imminent. Instead of making a quick throw to third base, he inexplicably took a big crow hop, as if firing to home from the outfield. By the time he actually released the ball, the runner Jon Jay was almost at the base and  Breslow  had been  overthinking  the throw for a few seconds. His error was almost predictable. 
 Baseball fans should keep an eye on pitchers' fielding abilities as the World Series shifts to St. Louis. It's typical for pundits and forecasters to size up a playoff matchup by examining the teams' more obvious assets: the back end of the bullpen, the middle of the lineup, and so on. 
 But when two teams are as evenly matched as the 2013 Red Sox and Cardinals, it may come down to which team's pitchers can execute routine throws, especially if history serves an any indication.
----
The Blueprint to Building a Successful NFL Franchise in the Salary Cap Era Building a winning NFL team isn't like any other construction project. 
 NFL executives have a budget, a crew, equipment and raw materials&mdash;but the wrecking balls start swinging the instant they're done; all they can do is hope more of their building survives 17 weeks of destruction than any of the other 31 buildings on the same block. 
 A year after they started, they salvage what they can from the wreckage and start all over again. 
 In today's NFL, the salary cap is stubbornly flat, making budgets tight around the league. There's only so much cap money to go around, and the average annual value of big-money contracts seems to go up with each new contract extension. 
 NFL executives can't just try to get good players at every spot on the roster; market prices and the salary cap force them to approach roster-building with a clear philosophy. Which positions will be strengths? Which positions will have depth? If any positions have strength and depth, where will they skimp? 
 Surveying today's NFL landscape, is there an ideal roster-building philosophy? Go big on a quarterback? Build a smothering defense? Hoard dominant    playmakers   ? 
 Is there a way to invest your team's salary-cap resources that will give you an advantage over everyone else? 
 
 Offense vs. Defense vs. Both 
 The first question to answer is whether it's best to invest more heavily in offense, defense or strive to be balanced. 
 Obviously, if we're waving magic wands, it's best to have a great offense and a great defense, but we're not waving magic wands&mdash;we're writing checks. Let's take a look at the 2012 playoff teams, and see how they built their mousetraps: 
 
 The surest sign of strength in the NFL is points differential: The total points a team's offense has scored, minus the total points its defense has allowed. In 2012, 11 of the 12 playoff teams were among the top 13 teams in points differential. 
 Only the No. 6 Chicago Bears and No. 9 New York Giants finished in the top 13 in points differential and missed out on the playoffs; only the No. 21 Indianapolis Colts were outside the top 13 and made the postseason. 
 Organized from left to right, we see the Patriots with the NFL's highest-scoring offense and No. 9 scoring defense&mdash;not surprisingly, they had the NFL's best scoring differential. Second best in scoring differential were the Denver Broncos, who had the No. 2 offense and No. 4 defense. 
 Then the pendulum swings back toward defense, with the Seahawks, 49ers and Falcons finishing third through fifth in scoring differential. Those three teams all had top-five scoring defenses, but finished ninth, 11th and seventh in scoring offense, respectively. 
 The Washington Redskins were an interesting case: They finished with the No. 4 scoring offense at 27.2 points per game, but 22nd in scoring defense, allowing 24.2 points per game. The 49ers had the highest disparity the other way, with that No. 2 defense and No. 11 offense. 
 Outside of the Redskins defense, and both units from the Minnesota Vikings and Indianapolis Colts, every playoff team's offense and defense finished in the top 12 of the league. Here's the table feeding that chart: 
 
 Unfortunately for NFL executives, It looks like the answer is "both." Even teams with exceptional offenses or defenses are at a big disadvantage if the other unit isn't at least above average. 
 
 How Do You Get Both? 
 There's only $123 million in cap money to spend. If you want a top-10 quarterback, that's going to eat up $15 to $20 million right off the top, per    Spotrac   .com. 
 Leaving $103 million for the rest of the pot sounds like plenty, but signing one player to a $20 million contract drops the average salary available per roster spot from $2.32 million to $1.98 million; that's a $340,000 gap across 52 roster spots in a league where the minimum rookie salary is $405,000. 
 Many fans love the idea of forgoing the big quarterback, and spending that money bolstering the running game and defense. When the 2000 Baltimore Ravens won a Super Bowl with unheralded quarterback Trent    Dilfer    at the helm, they proved this model could work. 
 The problem: In order to pull that off, the Ravens didn't only need one of the best scoring defenses of all time, allowing just 10.3 points per game. They also needed a top-five running game to muster a scoring offense that ranked 14th in the NFL. 
 In order to make up for the drag a replacement-level quarterback puts on a team, the rest of the team has to be truly exceptional. 
 The quarterback market is extremely efficient. As this chart shows, only Joe Flacco's monster deal (born of a negotiation where he had unprecedented leverage) and Tom Brady's intentional discount vary from a tight correlation between performance and pay: 
 
 There's a reason teams are spending so much on top quarterbacks; they do wonders for the rest of the team. Avoiding interceptions is the biggest part of maximizing a team's turnover margin, and turnover margin is a huge driver of success, on both sides of the ball. Offenses that avoid turning it over turn more drives into points; defenses that take the ball away stop other teams from scoring. 
 Just look at the correlation between points differential and turnover differential: 
 
 For those of you who aren't stats geeks, that r-squared value is what's called the "coefficient of determination," and it goes from zero (a quarterback's thrown interceptions have no effect on point differential) to one (thrown interceptions are the sole factor in determining point differential). 
 An R-squared of 0.4683 is a very, very strong correlation, and it's about twice as strong as the still-significant R-squared of defensive interceptions to point differential (0.2354). 
 Fumbles are part of turnovers too, but it's very well established that fumble recovery rates are all but completely random, and forced fumbles not much less so. Football Outsiders even publishes an annual summary of fumble luck and highlights extremely    un   - and lucky teams due for a regression to the mean. 
 Investing money in defense hoping to snag more turnovers won't bear as much win-loss fruit as investing money in a quarterback who'll make plays without turning the ball over much. 
 
 Protecting Your Investment? 
 Let's say you have your franchise quarterback (In which case, congratulations! He'll make you look smart for as long as your checks clear). Is it better to maximize his performance by protecting him with quality pass blocking, or surrounding him with weapons? 
 It's awfully hard to isolate quality quarterback play from quality receiver play. It's also hard to isolate quality quarterback play from quality offensive line play. Pro Football Focus team offense stats (subscription required) can get us close, though. 
 Let's regress 2012's team adjusted net yards per attempt (a great one-number passing effectiveness stat that incorporates touchdowns, sacks and interceptions) against Pro Football Focus team "Pass" grades (incorporating the play of the quarterback and all pass-catchers): 
 
 As with the correlation between thrown interceptions and point differential, we see a huge coefficient of determination: 0.4775. If you have good quarterback play, and receivers who get open and make plays, you will move the ball very effectively, with more touchdowns and fewer interceptions. 
 Not exactly rocket science, but it confirms that    PFF   's subjective grading system correlates strongly with statistical reality. 
 Now let's look at the same adjusted net yards per attempt, this time regressed against    PFF   's team pass block grades: 
 
 Again, we have a significant coefficient of determination (0.197), but not nearly as huge as the connection between passing game production and quality quarterback/receiver play. 
 This makes intuitive sense. 
 The Carolina Panthers have the fourth-best    PFF    team pass block grade (subscription required) so far in 2013, but they aren't getting great receiver play, and quarterback Cam Newton got off to a slow start. The Detroit Lions are getting surprisingly solid play from their patchwork offensive line&mdash;but have invested huge money and draft picks getting Stafford weapons. 
 Both quarterbacks are former No. 1 overall draft picks of surpassing physical talent a year apart in age, and experienced enough to have ironed out any rookie luck, good or bad. 
 So far this season, though, Newton's adjusted net yards per attempt is 6.25, ranked 15th in the NFL; Stafford's is 7.30, ranked seventh. 
 
    Moneyball    
 Of course, the best way to maximize your cap dollars is to get talent at less cost than it's worth. 
 
 The Lions rolled with depth veterans and rookie Larry    Warford    at three of the five offensive line spots; per    PFF ,   they're getting better pass blocking (subscription required) than teams like the St. Louis Rams and Chicago Bears, who spent big free-agent money on veteran linemen. 
 The word "Moneyball" has jumped the shark , according to The Washington Post    Wonkblog    writer Lydia    DePillis   . 
 She may have a point, when it comes to folks slapping the word "Moneyball" for any kind of statistical optimization. Its original use still holds water, though: Sports teams can beat their competition by getting worthwhile production from players they didn't pay free-market price for. 
 As the Washington Redskins found out between the time owner Dan Snyder bought the team and current general manager Bruce Allen took over, there isn't a direct correlation between money spent and on-field production. 
 
 Follow the Blueprint 
 The Chiefs are the toast of the town, a worst-to-first revival that's as unexpected as it is spectacular. How did they do it? 
 
 Head coach Andy Reid inherited a stout running game and relentless pass defense, gave up a whole lot (likely, two second-round picks) to get a quarterback whose best quality is that he doesn't throw interceptions, and added veteran pass-catchers like receiver Donnie Avery and tight end Anthony Fasano. 
 Admittedly, Avery and Fasano haven't panned out like Reid may have hoped. By refusing to fork over huge money to extend veteran left tackle Branden Albert, though, and drafting rookie Eric Fisher to eventually replace Albert on the cheap, Reid and the Chiefs are following our statistical blueprint to a "T." 
 It's hard to argue with the results.